Washington statutes.
RCW 16.50.160

Injunctions against violations.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter in the superior court in the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur, notwithstanding the existence of the other remedies at law.

[ 1967 c 31 s 6.]